Utah statutes.
9-6-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Advisory board" means the Museum Services Advisory Board created in Section 9-6-604.

(2)  "Board" means the Board of Directors of the Utah Arts Council created in Section 9-6-204.

(3)  "Council" means the Utah Arts Council created in Section 9-6-301.

(4)  "Director" means the director of the Division of Arts and Museums.

(5)  "Division" means the Division of Arts and Museums.

(6)  "Museum" means an organized and permanent institution that:

(a)  is owned or controlled by the state, a county, or a municipality, or is a nonprofit organization;

(b)  has an educational or aesthetic purpose;

(c)  owns or curates a tangible collection; and

(d)  exhibits the collection to the public on a regular schedule.

(7)  "Office" means the Office of Museum Services created in Section 9-6-602.

(8) (a)  "Pass-through funding" means funds appropriated by the Legislature to a state agency that are intended to be passed through the state agency to:

(i)  local governments;

(ii)  other government agencies;

(iii)  private organizations, including not-for-profits; or

(iv)  persons in the form of a loan or grant.

(b)  The funding may be:

(i)  general funds, federal funds, dedicated credits, or any combination of funding sources; and

(ii)  ongoing or one-time.



Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

